Utah statutes.
53-10-113.   Other agencies to cooperate with division.

(1)  All agencies of the state and local governments shall cooperate with the division in discharging its responsibilities under:

(a)  this chapter;

(b)  Title 32B, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act;

(c)  Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substance Act;

(d)  Title 58, Chapter 37a, Utah Drug Paraphernalia Act;

(e)  Title 58, Chapter 37b, Imitation Controlled Substances Act; and

(f)  Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substance Precursor Act.

(2)  This part does not relieve local law enforcement agencies or officers of the responsibility of enforcing laws relating to alcoholic beverages and alcoholic products or any other laws.

(3)  The powers and duties conferred upon the director and the officers of the division are not a limitation upon the powers and duties of other peace officers in the state.

